Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1205
Ambulance, defined.

Ambulance means any privately or publicly owned motor vehicle or aircraft that is especially designed, constructed or modified, and equipped and is intended to be used and is maintained or operated for the overland or air transportation of patients upon the streets, roads, highways, airspace, or public ways in this state or any other motor vehicles or aircraft used for such purposes.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 489;

Laws 2018, LB1034, § 11.